Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 366, O.S.L.


2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20C), is amended to read as


follows:



Req. No. 2769 Page 1


Section 20C. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or


after January 1, 2026, Class A1 shall include the following criminal


offenses:


1. Domestic abuse committed against a pregnant woman with


knowledge of the pregnancy and a miscarriage occurs or injury to the


unborn child, as provided for in subsection E of Section 644 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


2. Administering poison with intent to kill, as provided for in


Section 651 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


3. Second degree murder, as provided for in paragraph 1 of


Section 701.8 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


4. Second degree murder by a person engaged in the commission


of a felony, as provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 701.8 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


5. Kidnapping for the purpose of extorting money, as provided


for in subsection A of Section 745 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


6. Sexual abuse of a child under twelve (12) years of age, as


provided for in subsection F of Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


7. Sexual exploitation of a child under twelve (12) years of


age, as provided for in subsection I of Section 843.5 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 2769 Page 2


8. Sexual abuse of a child under fourteen (14) years of age


subsequent to a previous conviction of sexual abuse of a child under


fourteen (14) years of age, as provided for in subsection K of


Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


9. Soliciting or aiding a minor to perform an obscene act, as


provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 1021 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


10. Showing, exhibiting, loaning, or distributing to a minor


child obscene material or child pornography for purposes of inducing


the minor to participate in an obscene act, as provided for in


paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


11. Murder, maiming, robbery, rape, or arson committed in the


course of a riot, as provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 1312 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


12. Burglary by the aid or use of any explosive, as provided


for in Section 1441 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


13. Place Placing, manufacture manufacturing, possess


possessing, display displaying, or threaten threatening to use any


explosive or incendiary device and personal injury results, as


provided for in Section 1767.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;





Req. No. 2769 Page 3


14. Aggravated manufacturing of a controlled dangerous


substance, as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection G of Section


2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


15. Using any explosive or blasting agent to kill, injure, or


intimidate any person or to damage any real or personal property and


personal injury results, as provided for in subsection B of Section


124.8 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Any person convicted of a Class A1 criminal offense set


forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the


corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 843.5, as


last amended by Section 8, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 843.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 843.5. A. Any person who shall willfully or


maliciously engage in child abuse, as defined in this section,


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense


punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for a term not exceeding life imprisonment, or by


imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one (1) year,


or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor


more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine


imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


B. Any person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare of


a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in enabling child

Req. No. 2769 Page 4


abuse, as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty


of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be punished punishable by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a


term not exceeding life imprisonment fifteen (15) years, or by


imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one (1) year,


or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor


more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine


imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


C. Any person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare of


a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child neglect,


as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


Class B1 felony offense and shall be punished punishable by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a


term not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county


jail for a term not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less


than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand


Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine imprisonment and


imprisonment fine.


D. Any parent or other person who shall willfully or


maliciously engage in enabling child neglect shall, upon conviction,


be guilty of a Class B1 felony offense and shall be punished


punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for a term not exceeding life imprisonment fifteen (15)


years, or by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding

Req. No. 2769 Page 5


one (1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by


both such fine imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


E. Any person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare of


a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child sexual


abuse, as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty


of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be punished punishable by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a


term not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county


jail for a term not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less


than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand


Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine imprisonment and


imprisonment fine, except as provided in Section 51.1a of this title


or as otherwise provided in subsection F of this section for a child


victim under twelve (12) years of age. Except for persons sentenced


to life or life without parole, any person sentenced to imprisonment


for two (2) years or more for a violation of this subsection shall


be required to serve a term of post-imprisonment supervision


pursuant to subparagraph f of paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section


991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes under conditions


determined by the Department of Corrections. The jury shall be


advised that the mandatory post-imprisonment supervision shall be in


addition to the actual imprisonment.



Req. No. 2769 Page 6


F. Any person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare of


a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child sexual


abuse, as defined in this section, to a child under twelve (12)


years of age shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A1 felony


offense and shall be punished punishable by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not less than


twenty-five (25) years nor more than life imprisonment, and by a


fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than


Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).


G. Any parent or other person who shall willfully or


maliciously engage in enabling child sexual abuse shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be


punished punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department


of Corrections for a term not exceeding life imprisonment, or by


imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one (1) year,


or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor


more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine


imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


H. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously engage in


child sexual exploitation, as defined in this section, shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be


punished punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department


of Corrections for a term not exceeding life imprisonment, or by


imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one (1) year,

Req. No. 2769 Page 7


or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor


more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine


imprisonment and imprisonment fine, except as provided in subsection


I of this section for a child victim under twelve (12) years of age.


Except for persons sentenced to life or life without parole, any


person sentenced to imprisonment for two (2) years or more for a


violation of this subsection shall be required to serve a term of


post-imprisonment supervision pursuant to subparagraph f of


paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 991a of Title 22 of the


Oklahoma Statutes under conditions determined by the Department of


Corrections. The jury shall be advised that the mandatory post-


imprisonment supervision shall be in addition to the actual


imprisonment.


I. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously engage in


child sexual exploitation, as defined in this section, of a child


under twelve (12) years of age shall, upon conviction, be guilty of


a Class A1 felony offense and shall be punished punishable by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a


term not less than twenty-five (25) years nor more than life


imprisonment, and by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).


J. Any person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare of


a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in enabling child


sexual exploitation, as defined in this section, shall, upon

Req. No. 2769 Page 8


conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be


punished punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department


of Corrections for a term not exceeding life imprisonment, or by


imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one (1) year,


or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor


more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine


imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


K. Notwithstanding In addition to any other provision of


punishment prescribed by law, any person convicted of forcible anal


or oral sodomy, rape, or rape by instrumentation, or lewd


molestation of a child under fourteen (14) years of age subsequent


to a previous conviction for any offense of forcible anal or oral


sodomy, rape, rape by instrumentation, or lewd molestation of a


child under fourteen (14) years of age shall be guilty of a Class A1


felony offense and shall be punished punishable by death or by


imprisonment for life without parole.


L. Provided, however, that nothing contained in this section


shall prohibit any parent or guardian from using reasonable and


ordinary force pursuant to Section 844 of this title.


M. Consent shall not be a defense for any violation provided


for in this section.


N. Notwithstanding the age requirements of other statutes


referenced within this section, this section shall apply to any


child under eighteen (18) years of age.

Req. No. 2769 Page 9


O. It is an affirmative defense to subsections B and D of this


section if the accused:


1. Had a reasonable apprehension that any action to stop the


abuse or neglect would result in substantial bodily harm to the


accused or the child;


2. Experienced domestic violence resulting in substantial


bodily harm, or mental or emotional injury which impaired the


ability of the accused to take action to stop the child abuse or


neglect; or


3. Voluntarily took immediate steps to end the abuse or neglect


of the child, including prompt notification of a certified domestic


violence service provider, family justice center, medical provider,


or law enforcement authority.


P. The penalties provided in subsections B and D of this


section shall be retroactive. Any person who committed an offense


provided in subsection B or D of this section, before November 1,


2026, may institute an application for post-conviction relief


pursuant to paragraph 3 of Section 1080 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to create a


civil cause of action related to a change in the law governing an


applicant’s conviction.


Q. As used in this section:


1. “Child abuse” means:



Req. No. 2769 Page 10


a. the willful or malicious harm or threatened harm or


failure to protect from harm or threatened harm to the


health, safety, or welfare of a child under eighteen


(18) years of age by a person responsible for a


child’s health, safety, or welfare, or


b. the act of willfully or maliciously injuring,


torturing or maiming a child under eighteen (18) years


of age by any person;


2. “Child neglect” means the a willful or malicious neglect, as


defined by Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, of


a child under eighteen (18) years of age by a person responsible for


a child’s health, safety or welfare act or failure to act by a


person responsible for a child’s health, safety, or welfare that


evidences the person’s blatant disregard for the consequences of the


act or failure to act, resulting in harm or threatened harm to the


child or creating an immediate danger to the child’s physical health


or safety. This includes failing to provide basic necessities like


food, clothing, shelter, medical care, or supervision;


3. “Child sexual abuse” means the willful or malicious sexual


abuse of a child under eighteen (18) years of age by a person


responsible for a child’s health, safety, or welfare and includes,


but is not limited to:


a. sexual intercourse,



Req. No. 2769 Page 11


b. penetration of the vagina or anus, however slight, by


an inanimate object or any part of the human body not


amounting to sexual intercourse,


c. sodomy,


d. incest, or


e. a lewd act or proposal, as defined in this section;


4. “Child sexual exploitation” means the willful or malicious


sexual exploitation of a child under eighteen (18) years of age by


another and includes, but is not limited to:


a. human trafficking, as provided for in Section 748 of


this title, if the offense involved child trafficking


for commercial sex,


b. trafficking in children, as provided for in Section


866 of this title, if the offense was committed for


the sexual gratification of any person,


c. procuring or causing the participation of a minor in


child pornography sexual abuse material, as provided


for in Section 1021.2 of this title,


d. purchase, procurement, or possession of child


pornography sexual abuse material, as provided for in


Section 1024.2 of this title,


e. engaging in or soliciting prostitution, as provided


for in Section 1029 of this title, if the offense


involved child sex trafficking,

Req. No. 2769 Page 12


f. publication, distribution, or participation in the


preparation of obscene material, as provided for in


Section 1040.8 of this title, if the offense involved


child pornography sexual abuse material,


g. aggravated possession of child pornography sexual


abuse material, as provided for in Section 1040.12a of


this title,


h. sale or distribution of obscene material, as provided


for in Section 1040.13 of this title,


i. soliciting sexual conduct or communication with a


minor by use of technology, as provided for in Section


1040.13a of this title,


j. offering or transporting a child for purposes of child


sex trafficking, as provided for in Section 1087 of


this title, and


k. child sex trafficking, as provided for in Section 1088


of this title;


5. “Enabling child abuse” means the causing, procuring, or


permitting of child abuse by a person responsible for a child’s


health, safety, or welfare;


6. “Enabling child neglect” means the causing, procuring, or


permitting of child neglect by a person responsible for a child’s


health, safety, or welfare;



Req. No. 2769 Page 13


7. “Enabling child sexual abuse” means the causing, procuring,


or permitting of child sexual abuse by a person responsible for a


child’s health, safety, or welfare;


8. “Enabling child sexual exploitation” means the causing,


procuring, or permitting of child sexual exploitation by a person


responsible for a child’s health, safety, or welfare;


9. “Incest” means marrying, committing adultery, or fornicating


with a child by a person responsible for the health, safety, or


welfare of a child;


10. “Lewd act or proposal” means:


a. making any oral, written, or electronic or computer-


generated lewd or indecent proposal to a child for the


child to have unlawful sexual relations or sexual


intercourse with any person,


b. looking upon, touching, mauling, or feeling the body


or private parts of a child in a lewd or lascivious


manner or for the purpose of sexual gratification,


c. asking, inviting, enticing, or persuading any child to


go alone with any person to a secluded, remote, or


secret place for a lewd or lascivious purpose,


d. urinating or defecating upon a child or causing,


forcing, or requiring a child to defecate or urinate


upon the body or private parts of another person for


the purpose of sexual gratification,

Req. No. 2769 Page 14


e. ejaculating upon or in the presence of a child,


f. causing, exposing, forcing, or requiring a child to


look upon the body or private parts of another person


for the purpose of sexual gratification,


g. causing, forcing, or requiring any child to view any


obscene materials, child pornography sexual abuse


material or materials deemed harmful to minors as such


terms are defined in Sections 1024.1 and 1040.75 of


this title,


h. causing, exposing, forcing, or requiring a child to


look upon sexual acts performed in the presence of the


child for the purpose of sexual gratification, or


i. causing, forcing, or requiring a child to touch or


feel the body or private parts of the child or another


person for the purpose of sexual gratification;


11. “Permit” means to authorize or allow for the care of a


child by an individual when the person authorizing or allowing such


care knows or reasonably should know that the child will be placed


at risk of the conduct or harm proscribed by this section;


12. “Person responsible for a child’s health, safety, or


welfare” for purposes of this section shall include, but not be


limited to:


a. the parent of the child,


b. the legal guardian of the child,

Req. No. 2769 Page 15


c. the custodian of the child,


d. the foster parent of the child,


e. a person eighteen (18) years of age or older with whom


the parent of the child cohabitates, who is at least


three (3) years older than the child,


f. any other person eighteen (18) years of age or older


residing in the home of the child, who is at least


three (3) years older than the child,


g. an owner, operator, agent, employee, or volunteer of a


public or private residential home, institution,


facility, or day treatment program, as defined in


Section 175.20 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


that the child attended,


h. an owner, operator, agent, employee, or volunteer of a


child care facility, as defined in Section 402 of


Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes, that the child


attended,


i. an intimate partner of the parent of the child, as


defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, or


j. a person who has voluntarily accepted responsibility


for the care or supervision of a child;


13. “Sexual intercourse” means the actual penetration, however


slight, of the vagina or anus by the penis; and

Req. No. 2769 Page 16


14. “Sodomy” means:


a. penetration, however slight, of the mouth of the child


by a penis,


b. penetration, however slight, of the vagina of a person


responsible for a child’s health, safety, or welfare,


by the mouth of a child,


c. penetration, however slight, of the mouth of the


person responsible for a child’s health, safety, or


welfare by the penis of the child, or


d. penetration, however slight, of the vagina of the


child by the mouth of the person responsible for a


child’s health, safety, or welfare.


SECTION 3. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 843.5, as


amended by Section 6, Chapter 59, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 843.5), is hereby repealed.


SECTION 4. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 843.5, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 281, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 843.5), is hereby repealed.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2769 CN 1/6/2026 9:25:40 AM







Req. No. 2769 Page 17